Utah statutes.
16-6a-610.   Purchase of memberships.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, a nonprofit corporation may not purchase the membership of a member:

(a)  who resigns; or

(b)  whose membership is terminated.

(2) (a)  If so authorized, a nonprofit corporation may purchase the membership of a member who resigns or whose membership is terminated for the amount and pursuant to the conditions set forth in or authorized by:

(i)  its bylaws; or

(ii)  agreement with the affected member.

(b)  A payment permitted under Subsection (2)(a) may not violate:

(i)  Section 16-6a-1301; or

(ii)  any other provision of this chapter.

